Hawaii statutes.
§281-4 Liquor consumption on unlicensed
premises prohibited, when. (a) It shall be unlawful for any person who
keeps or maintains any restaurant or other premises where food, beverages, or
entertainment are provided or brought in by patrons or guests, whether for
compensation or not, or to which members of the public or members of an
organization resort for food, refreshment, or entertainment and who is not a
licensee of the commission under this chapter, to promote, encourage, aid, or
permit the consumption of liquor on the premises, except during the hours
between 6:00 a.m. and 12:00 a.m. Any premises that desires to operate after
12:00 a.m. until 2:00 a.m. shall obtain a class 17 liquor license under section
281-31(q), and shall be subject to the requirements of this chapter and the
rules adopted by the liquor commission of the county in which the premises are
located during all hours of operation, except as otherwise provided by law.

(b) It shall be unlawful for any person who is
present at any restaurant or other premises where food, beverages, or
entertainment are sold, provided, or brought in by patrons or guests, or to
which members of the public, or members of an organization, resort for food,
refreshment, or entertainment, and which premises are not licensed by the
commission under this chapter, to consume any liquor on the premises, except
during the hours between which licensed premises of dispensers are permitted to
be open for the transaction of business in the county where the premises are
located.

(c) It shall be unlawful for any person who
keeps or maintains any restaurant or other premises where food, beverages, or
entertainment are provided, or brought in by patrons or guests, whether
compensated or not, to sell or provide or allow the consumption of liquor to or
for any of the following persons knowing that such person has, or is about to
obtain, liquor for consumption by the person on the premises, to wit:

(1) Any minor;

(2) Any person at the time under the influence of
liquor;

(3) Any disorderly person;

(4) Any person known to be addicted to the excessive
use of liquor; or

(5) Any person, for consumption in any vehicle on the
premises;

provided that the providing of liquor to or for a
minor who has or is about to obtain liquor for consumption by the minor on the
premises or allowing the consumption of liquor by a minor shall not be deemed
to be a violation of this subsection if, at the time, the person providing or
allowing the consumption of liquor was misled by the appearance of the minor
and the attending circumstances into honestly believing that such minor was of
legal age and the person acted in good faith, and it shall be incumbent upon
the person to prove that the person so acted in good faith.

(d) Within the meaning of this section, the
word "premises" includes any vessel as well as any place, with or
without a structure thereon, and the hours between which licensed premises of
dispensers are permitted to be open for the transaction of business shall be
deemed to be those during which such dispensers are permitted to keep open
their premises for the sale, service, and consumption of liquor, or any of
them. [L 1949, c 147, §1; RL 1955, §159-4; HRS §281-4; am L 1972, c 177, §2;
gen ch 1985; am L 2008, c 168, §2; am L 2010, c 198, §1]

Case Notes

Injunction against enforcement without showing direct
invasion of property right. 39 H. 23.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next